Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6282.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Legislator" means a member of the senate or the house of representatives of this state. (b) "Utility consumer participation board" means the utility consumer participation board created under section 6l(3) of 1939 PA 3, MCL 460.6l. Sec. 2. A former legislator, for not less than 2 years after leaving the legislature, shall not accept employment with an entity that receives a grant from the utility consumer participation board. Sec. 3. A former legislator who violates this act is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days, a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both.